Utah statutes.
58-20a-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.
(1)  A person shall hold a license under this chapter in order to engage in
the practice of environmental health science while employed by any of the
following, except as specifically exempted in Section 58-20a-305 or 58-1-307:
(a)  a local health department;
(b)  the state Department of Health;
(c)  the state Department of Human Services;
(d)  the Department of Agriculture and Food as a food and dairy compliance
officer; or
(e)  a local health department as its director of environmental health
services.
(2)  Any other individual not subject to Subsection (1) may also be licensed
under this chapter upon compliance with all requirements.
(3)  The division shall issue to persons who qualify under this chapter a
license in the classification:
(a)  environmental health scientist; or
(b)  environmental health scientist-in-training.
